Maryland, session 2025, HB0767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–401.
(f) (1) (i) [Subject] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 8–407 OF THIS
SUBTITLE AND SUBJECT to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, if judgment
is given in favor of the landlord, and the tenant fails to comply with the requirements of
the order within 7 days, the court shall, at any time after the expiration of the 7 days, issue
its warrant, directed to any official of the county entitled to serve process, ordering the
official to cause the landlord to have again and repossess the property by putting the
landlord, or the landlord’s duly qualified agent or attorney, in possession of the property[,
and for that purpose to remove from the property, by force if necessary, all the furniture,
implements, tools, goods, effects or other chattels of every description whatsoever belonging
to the tenant, or to any person claiming or holding by or under the tenant].
(ii) If the landlord does not order a warrant of restitution within 60
days from the later of the date of judgment or the expiration date of any stay of execution:

HOUSE BILL 767 3
1. The judgment for possession shall be stricken; and
2. The judgment shall be applied to the number of judgments
necessary to foreclose a tenant’s right to redemption of the leased premises as established
in subsection [(g)(2)] (H)(2) of this section unless the court in its discretion determines that
the judgment may not apply for purposes of subsection [(g)(2)] (H)(2) of this section.
(iii) If the landlord orders a warrant of restitution but takes no action
on the warrant within 60 days from the later of the date the court issues the order for the
warrant or the date as otherwise extended by the court:
1. The warrant of restitution shall expire and the judgment
for possession shall be stricken; and
2. The judgment shall be applied to the number of judgments
necessary to foreclose a tenant’s right to redemption of the leased premises as established
in subsection [(g)(2)] (H)(2) of this section unless the court in its discretion determines that
the judgment may not apply for purposes of subsection [(g)(2)] (H)(2) of this section.
(2) (i) The administrative judge of any district shall stay the execution
of a warrant of restitution of a residential property, from day to day, in the event of extreme
weather conditions affecting the residential property, including:
1. A temperature or next–day forecasted temperature of 32
degrees Fahrenheit or lower;
2. A winter storm warning or blizzard warning issued by the
National Weather Service;
3. A hurricane warning or tropical storm warning issued by
the National Weather Service; and
4. An excessive heat warning issued by the National
Weather Service.
(ii) When a stay has been granted under this paragraph, the
execution of the warrant of restitution for which the stay has been granted shall be given
priority and completed within 5 days after the extreme weather conditions cease.
(G) A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
EXECUTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF § 8–407 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(g)] (H) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, in any action of
summary ejectment for failure to pay rent where the landlord is awarded a judgment giving
the landlord restitution of the leased premises, the tenant shall have the right to

HOUSE BILL 767
redemption of the leased premises by tendering in cash, certified check, or money order to
the landlord or the landlord’s agent all past due amounts, as determined by the court under
subsection (e) of this section, plus all court awarded costs and fees, at any time before actual
execution of the eviction order.
(2) An electronic or written check issued by a political subdivision or on
behalf of a governmental entity shall have the same legal effect as a payment made by the
tenant under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) This subsection does not apply to any tenant against whom three
judgments of possession have been entered for rent due and unpaid in the 12 months prior
to the initiation of the action to which this subsection otherwise would apply.
[(h)] (I) (1) The tenant or the landlord may appeal from the judgment of the
District Court to the circuit court for any county at any time within 4 days from the
rendition of the judgment.
(2) The tenant, in order to stay any execution of the judgment, shall give a
bond to the landlord with one or more sureties, who are owners of sufficient property in the
State of Maryland, with condition to prosecute the appeal with effect, and answer to the
landlord in all costs and damages mentioned in the judgment, and other damages as shall
be incurred and sustained by reason of the appeal.
(3) The bond shall not affect in any manner the right of the landlord to
proceed against the tenant, assignee or subtenant for any and all rents that may become
due and payable to the landlord after the rendition of the judgment.
8–402.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to § 8–406 of this subtitle and where any tenancy is for
any definite term or at will, and the landlord shall desire to repossess the property after
the expiration of the term for which it was leased and shall give notice as required under
subsection (c) of this section to the tenant or to the person actually in possession of the
property to remove from the property at the end of the term, and if the tenant or person in
actual possession shall refuse to comply, the landlord may make complaint in writing to
the District Court of the county where the property is located.
(ii) 1. The court shall issue a summons directed to any constable
or sheriff of the county entitled to serve process, ordering the constable or sheriff to notify
the tenant, assignee, or subtenant to appear on a day stated in the summons before the
court to show cause why restitution should not be made to the landlord.
2. The constable or sheriff shall serve the summons on the
tenant, assignee, or subtenant on the property, or on the known or authorized agent of the
tenant, assignee, or subtenant.

HOUSE BILL 767 5
3. If, for any reason those persons cannot be found, the
constable or sheriff shall affix an attested copy of the summons conspicuously on the
property.
4. After notice to the tenant, assignee, or subtenant by
first–class mail, the affixing of the summons on the property shall be conclusively presumed
to be a sufficient service to support restitution.
(iii) [Upon] ON the failure of either of the parties to appear before
the court on the day stated in the summons, the court may continue the case to a day not
less than 6 [nor] DAYS OR more than 10 days after the day first stated and notify the
parties of the continuance.
(2) (i) If [upon] ON hearing the parties, or in case the tenant or person
in possession shall neglect to appear after the summons and continuance the court shall
find that the landlord had been in possession of the leased property, that the said tenancy
is fully ended and expired, that due notice to quit as aforesaid had been given to the tenant
or person in possession and that the tenant or person in possession had refused so to do,
the court shall [thereupon] give judgment for the restitution of the possession of said
premises and shall forthwith issue its warrant to the sheriff or a constable in the respective
counties commanding the tenant or person in possession forthwith to deliver to the landlord
possession thereof in as full and ample manner as the landlord was possessed of the same
at the time when the tenancy was made, and shall give judgment for costs against the
tenant or person in possession so holding over.
(ii) Either party shall have the right to appeal therefrom to the
circuit court for the county within 10 days from the judgment.
(iii) If the tenant appeals and files with the District Court an affidavit
that the appeal is not taken for delay, and also a good and sufficient bond with one or more
securities conditioned that the tenant will prosecute the appeal with effect and well and
truly pay all rent in arrears and all costs in the case before the District Court and in the
appellate court and all loss or damage which the landlord may suffer by reason of the
tenant’s holding over, including the value of the premises during the time the tenant shall
so hold over, then the tenant or person in possession of said premises may retain possession
thereof until the determination of said appeal.
(iv) The appellate court shall, [upon] ON application of either party,
set a day for the hearing of the appeal, not less than 5 [nor] DAYS OR more than 15 days
after the application, and notice for the order for a hearing shall be served on the opposite
party or that party’s counsel at least 5 days before the hearing.
(v) If the judgment of the District Court shall be in favor of the
landlord, a warrant shall be issued by the appellate court to the sheriff, who shall proceed
forthwith to execute the warrant.

HOUSE BILL 767
(3) A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE EXECUTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF §
8–407 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
8–402.1.
(a) (1) (i) Subject to § 8–406 of this subtitle and where an unexpired lease
for a stated term provides that the landlord may repossess the premises prior to the
expiration of the stated term if the tenant breaches the lease, the landlord may make
complaint in writing to the District Court of the county where the premises is located if:
1. The tenant breaches the lease;
2. A. The landlord has given the tenant 30 days’ written
notice that the tenant is in violation of the lease and the landlord desires to repossess the
leased premises; or
B. The breach of the lease involves behavior by a tenant or a
person who is on the property with the tenant’s consent, which demonstrates a clear and
imminent danger of the tenant or person doing serious harm to themselves, other tenants,
the landlord, the landlord’s property or representatives, or any other person on the property
and the landlord has given the tenant or person in possession 14 days’ written notice that
the tenant or person in possession is in violation of the lease and the landlord desires to
repossess the leased premises; and
3. The tenant or person in actual possession of the premises
refuses to comply.
(ii) The court shall summons immediately the tenant or person in
possession to appear before the court on a day stated in the summons to show cause, if any,
why restitution of the possession of the leased premises should not be made to the landlord.
(2) (i) If, for any reason, the tenant or person in actual possession
cannot be found, the constable or sheriff shall affix an attested copy of the summons
conspicuously on the property.
(ii) After notice is sent to the tenant or person in possession by
first–class mail, the affixing of the summons on the property shall be conclusively presumed
to be a sufficient service to support restitution.
(3) If either of the parties fails to appear before the court on the day stated
in the summons, the court may continue the case for not less than [six nor] 6 DAYS OR
more than 10 days and notify the parties of the continuance.
(b) (1) If the court determines that the tenant breached the terms of the lease
and that the breach was substantial and warrants an eviction, the court shall give

HOUSE BILL 767 7
judgment for the restitution of the possession of the premises and issue its warrant to the
sheriff or a constable commanding the tenant to deliver possession to the landlord in as full
and ample manner as the landlord was possessed of the same at the time when the lease
was entered into. The court shall give judgment for costs against the tenant or person in
possession.
(2) Either party may appeal to the circuit court for the county, within [ten]
10 days from entry of the judgment. If the tenant (i) files with the District Court an affidavit
that the appeal is not taken for delay; (ii) files sufficient bond with one or more securities
conditioned [upon] ON diligent prosecution of the appeal; (iii) pays all rent in arrears, all
court costs in the case; and (iv) pays all losses or damages which the landlord may suffer
by reason of the tenant’s holding over, the tenant or person in possession of the premises
may retain possession until the determination of the appeal. [Upon] ON application of
either party, the court shall set a day for the hearing of the appeal not less than [five nor]
5 DAYS OR more than 15 days after the application, and notice of the order for a hearing
shall be served on the other party or that party’s counsel at least [five] 5 days before the
hearing. If the judgment of the District Court is in favor of the landlord, a warrant shall be
issued by the court which hears the appeal to the sheriff, who shall execute the warrant.
(C) A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
EXECUTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF § 8–407 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(c)] (D) (1) Acceptance of any payment after notice but before eviction shall
not operate as a waiver of any notice of breach of lease or any judgment for possession
unless the parties specifically otherwise agree in writing.
(2) Any payment accepted shall be first applied to the rent or the
equivalent of rent apportioned to the date that the landlord actually recovers possession of
the premises, then to court costs, including court awarded damages and legal fees and then
to any loss of rent caused by the breach of lease.
(3) Any payment which is accepted in excess of the rent referred to in
paragraph (2) of this subsection shall not bear interest but will be returned to the tenant
in the same manner as security deposits as defined under § 8–203 of this title but shall not
be subject to the penalties of that section.
8–407.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION ISSUED TO A
LANDLORD TO TAKE POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY UNDER § 8–401, §
8–402, OR § 8–402.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR AN EQUIVALENT PROVISION OF PUBLIC
LOCAL LAW.
(B) (1) AFTER SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, AFTER A
COURT HAS ISSUED A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION, THE LANDLORD SHALL, AT LEAST

HOUSE BILL 767
14 6 DAYS BEFORE THE SCHEDULED DATE OF REPOSSESSION AS SET BY THE
SHERIFF, PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE TENANT OF THE DATE ON WHICH THE
WARRANT OF RESTITUTION IS SCHEDULED TO BE EXECUTED BY:
(I) SENDING THE NOTICE BY FIRST–CLASS MAIL WITH
CERTIFICATE OF MAILING; AND
(II) POSTING THE NOTICE ON THE FRONT DOOR OF THE LEASED
PREMISES AND TAKING A DATE–STAMPED PHOTOGRAPH OF THE NOTICE POSTED ON
THE FRONT DOOR; AND
(III) IF THE LANDLORD KNOWS OR HAS ON FILE THE E–MAIL
ADDRESS OR CELLPHONE NUMBER OF THE TENANT, SENDING THE NOTICE
ELECTRONICALLY TO THE TENANT BY AN E–MAIL MESSAGE OR A TEXT MESSAGE.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE DISTRICT COURT SUMMARY EJECTMENT CASE
NUMBER;
(II) THE TENANT’S NAME AS STATED IN THE SUMMARY
EJECTMENT CASE;
(III) THE ADDRESS OF THE LEASED PREMISES;
(IV) THE DATE ON WHICH THE WARRANT OF RESTITUTION WAS
ORDERED BY THE DISTRICT COURT COURT;
(V) THE INITIAL SCHEDULED DATE OF THE EVICTION;
(VI) A STATEMENT THAT THE REPOSSESSION MAY OCCUR
UNLESS THE TENANT:
1. RETURNS POSSESSION OF THE LEASED PREMISES TO
THE LANDLORD; OR
2. FOR A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION ISSUED UNDER §
8–401 OF THIS SUBTITLE, EXERCISES THE RIGHT TO REDEMPTION UNDER § 8–401
OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF AVAILABLE;
(VII) IF THE TENANT STILL HAS A RIGHT TO REDEMPTION OF THE
LEASED PREMISES UNDER § 8–401(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A STATEMENT SHOWING
THE AMOUNT STILL DUE TO REDEEM THE PROPERTY;

HOUSE BILL 767 9
(VIII) A STATEMENT THAT IF THE EVICTION OCCURS:
1. WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE EVICTION DATE, THE
TENANT MAY RECLAIM ALL OF THE TENANT’S PERSONAL PROPERTY THAT WAS IN OR
AROUND THE LEASED PREMISES ON OR AFTER THE EVICTION DATE; AND
2. AFTER 10 DAYS AFTER THE EVICTION DATE, THE
TENANT’S REMAINING PERSONAL PROPERTY WILL BE CONSIDERED ABANDONED
AND MAY BE DISPOSED OF;
(IX) A STATEMENT INFORMING THE TENANT AS TO HOW THE
TENANT MAY OBTAIN ANY PERSONAL PROPERTY LEFT IN OR ABOUT THE LEASED
PREMISES AFTER THE EVICTION OCCURS;
(X) A STATEMENT THAT THE NOTICE IS THE FINAL NOTICE TO
THE TENANT OF THE INTENDED REPOSSESSION, EVEN IF THE REPOSSESSION IS
STAYED FOR ANY REASON;
(IX) THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT:
“YOU COULD LOSE ALL YOUR PERSONAL BELONGINGS LEFT
INSIDE YOUR HOME WHEN THE EVICTION OCCURS. LOCAL LAWS AND PRACTICES
ABOUT DISPOSAL OF ANY OF YOUR PERSONAL BELONGINGS UPON EVICTION VARY.
YOU MAY SEEK ADVICE BY CALLING 211 FOR A LEGAL REFERRAL
OR BY CONTACTING THE DISTRICT COURT HELP CENTER AT (INSERT THE
TELEPHONE NUMBER FOR THE DISTRICT COURT HELP CENTER) OR (INSERT THE
ADDRESS FOR THE WEBSITE OF THE DISTRICT COURT HELP CENTER) TO SPEAK TO
AN ATTORNEY.”; AND
(XI) (X) THE TELEPHONE NUMBER, E–MAIL ADDRESS, AND
MAILING ADDRESS AT WHICH THE LANDLORD MAY BE CONTACTED.
(3) A LANDLORD MAY CHARGE THE TENANT FOR EXPENSES
ACTUALLY INCURRED IN PROVIDING NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IN AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED $5.
(4) THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT A TENANT WAS
NOTIFIED AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE
LANDLORD PROVIDES TO THE SHERIFF OR CONSTABLE:
(I) THE CERTIFICATE OF MAILING;

HOUSE BILL 767
(II) A PHOTOGRAPH OF THE NOTICE POSTED ON THE FRONT
DOOR OF THE LEASED PREMISES CONTAINING A READABLE TIMESTAMP INDICATING
THE DATE AND TIME THAT THE NOTICE WAS POSTED; AND
(III) A SIGNED AFFIDAVIT OF THE PERSON WHO POSTED THE
NOTICE ON THE FRONT DOOR OF THE LEASED PREMISES.
(5) (I) IF THE SHERIFF REASONABLY BELIEVES THAT THE
LANDLORD HAS NOT PROVIDED THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION OR THAT THE TENANT MAY HAVE REDEEMED THE PROPERTY, THE
SHERIFF:
1. SHALL NOTIFY THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
2. MAY NOT EXECUTE THE WARRANT OF RESTITUTION
WITHOUT FURTHER ORDER OF THE DISTRICT COURT.
(II) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE LANDLORD DID
NOT PROVIDE THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL VACATE THE WARRANT OF RESTITUTION.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B)(5) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE
LANDLORD PRESENTS THE DOCUMENTATION LISTED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE SHERIFF OR CONSTABLE SHALL:
(1) SHALL FILE FILE THE DOCUMENTATION WITH THE CLERK OF THE
COURT; AND
(2) MAY SUBJECT TO § 14–806 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXECUTE THE
WARRANT OF RESTITUTION BY PUTTING THE LANDLORD IN POSSESSION OF THE
PREMISES, WITHOUT THE REMOVAL OF ANY PERSONAL PROPERTY FROM THE
PREMISES.
(D) IF A TENANT IS NOT PRESENT DURING THE EXECUTION OF THE
WARRANT OF RESTITUTION, THE SHERIFF OR CONSTABLE SHALL POST A NOTICE ON
THE FRONT DOOR OF THE PREMISES STATING THAT REPOSSESSION OF THE
PREMISES HAS BEEN COMPLETED AND THAT THE TENANT HAS 10 DAYS TO RECLAIM
THE TENANT’S PERSONAL PROPERTY.
(E) (1) (I) A TENANT SHALL HAVE 10 DAYS FOLLOWING THE
EXECUTION OF A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION TO RECOVER PERSONAL PROPERTY FROM THE PREMISES OR ANOTHER
REASONABLY SECURE LOCATION CHOSEN BY THE LANDLORD.

HOUSE BILL 767 11
(II) A LANDLORD MAY NOT CHARGE A TENANT ANY FEE FOR
STORING THE TENANT’S PERSONAL PROPERTY DURING THE 10–DAY PERIOD
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) DURING THE 10–DAY PERIOD ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE LANDLORD SHALL MAKE THE TENANT’S PERSONAL
PROPERTY REASONABLY AVAILABLE FOR PURPOSES OF RECLAMATION; AND
(II) THE LANDLORD IS NOT LIABLE TO THE TENANT FOR ANY
LOSSES RELATING TO THE PERSONAL PROPERTY UNLESS THE LOSS IS THE RESULT
OF A DELIBERATE OR NEGLIGENT ACT ON THE PART OF THE LANDLORD.
(3) A TENANT MAY NOT WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RECLAIM PERSONAL
PROPERTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) (1) UNLESS THE LANDLORD AND TENANT AGREE OTHERWISE,
PERSONAL PROPERTY REMAINING IN OR ABOUT THE LEASED PREMISES OR IN THE
REASONABLY SECURE STORAGE LOCATION CHOSEN BY THE LANDLORD FOLLOWING
THE 10–DAY PERIOD ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE DEEMED ABANDONED.
(2) THE LANDLORD OR ANY PERSON ACTING ON THE LANDLORD’S
BEHALF MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR ANY LOSS OF OR DAMAGE TO PROPERTY
DEEMED ABANDONED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A LANDLORD MAY DISPOSE OF ABANDONED PROPERTY BY:
1. TRANSPORTATION TO A LICENSED LANDFILL OR
SOLID WASTE FACILITY;
2. DONATION TO CHARITY;
3. SALE; OR
4. ANY OTHER LEGAL MEANS.
(II) IF A LANDLORD DISPOSES OF ABANDONED PROPERTY BY
SALE, THE TENANT SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ANY PROCEEDS OF THE SALE THAT
EXCEED ANY BACK RENT, MOVE–OUT COSTS, OR DAMAGE FEES OWED BY THE
TENANT TO THE LANDLORD.

HOUSE BILL 767
(4) PROPERTY DEEMED ABANDONED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY
NOT BE PLACED IN A PUBLIC RIGHT–OF–WAY OR ON ANY PUBLIC PROPERTY.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, ON
THE EXECUTION OF A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION, A LANDLORD IS NOT PROHIBITED
FROM:
(I) DISPOSING OF ABANDONED PROPERTY CONSISTING OF
PERISHABLE FOOD, HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, OR TRASH; OR
(II) TRANSFERRING AN ANIMAL TO THAT IS NOT REMOVED
UNDER § 14–806 OF THIS ARTICLE TO THE OWNER OF THE ANIMAL, AN ANIMAL
SHELTER, AN ANIMAL RESCUE ORGANIZATION, AN ANIMAL CONTROL OFFICER, A
HUMANE SOCIETY, OR ANY OTHER PERSON WILLING TO PROVIDE CARE FOR THE
ANIMAL.
(G) (E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE INTERPRETED TO RESTRICT
THE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE AND LOCAL JURISDICTIONS TO ENACT OR ENFORCE
LEGISLATION GOVERNING LANDLORDS AND TENANTS, INCLUDING LEGISLATION
ESTABLISHING THAT:
(1) INCREASES THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF DAYS OF NOTICE REQUIRED
IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION TO AS MANY AS 14 DAYS;
(2) DECREASES THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF DAYS OF NOTICE
REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION TO AS FEW AS 4 DAYS; OR
(3) ESTABLISHES PENALTIES FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(H) (F) IF A COURT FINDS IN FAVOR OF A TENANT BASED ON A VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION, THE TENANT IS ENTITLED TO:
(1) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(2) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS;
(3) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO RECOVER POSSESSION OF THE LEASED
PREMISES OR PERSONAL PROPERTY; OR
(4) ANY OTHER REMEDY THE COURT MAY FIND REASONABLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or

HOUSE BILL 767 13
application to any cause of action for repossession for failure to pay rent, breach of lease, or
tenant holdovers filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.